Alabama, session 2026rs, HB482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
37 Section 1. Sections 13A-8-36, 13A-8-37, 13A-8-37.1, and
38 13A-8-37.4, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
39 follows:
40 "§13A-8-36
41 (a) It is unlawful for a person with the intent to
42 damage property and having no right to do so, or any
43 reasonable ground to believe that he or she has such a right,
44 to damagedamages or destroysdestroy any of the following:
45 (1) Telecommunications, cable communications, or an
46 electric power transmission pedestal or pole owned or operated
47 by a telecommunications, cable, or electric power company or
48 cooperative, oran electric power supplier, or a railroad.
49 (2) Telecommunications, cable communications, or
50 electric power grounding or any other equipment or materials
51 used in the delivery of electricity, wire, fiber insulator,
52 power supply transformer, ground wire, or other apparatus,
53 equipment, or fixture used in the transmission of
54 telecommunications, cable communications, or electric power
55 owned or operated by a telecommunications, cable, or electric
56 power company or cooperative, oran electric power supplier, or
Page 2

power company or cooperative, oran electric power supplier, or
HB482 INTRODUCED
57 a railroad.
58 (3) Equipment used in the transmission of wireless
59 communications or related to wireless communications.
60 (4) Equipment used at any facility of over the
61 airover-the-air broadcast companies.
62 (5) Railroad materials and lading, including, but not
63 limited to, any rail telecommunications; cable communications;
64 power and signal equipment and wires; road/rail crossing
65 signals, equipment, and wires; metal property lading being
66 transported by a railroad; and any railroad track and other
67 operating materials, including switch component, spike, angle
68 bar, tie plate, or bolt of the type used in constructing
69 railroads.
70 (6) ElectricAny electric power line, gas line, water
71 line, wire or fiber insulators, electric motors or other
72 apparatus, heating and cooling systems, and environmental
73 control systems that are connected to farm shops, on-farm
74 grain drying and storage complexes, animal production
75 facilities, irrigation systems, greenhouse facilities, or
76 other agricultural, forestry, or food-related activities,
77 equipment, structures, systems, or vehicles.
78 (7) Any electric power line, gas line, water line, wire
79 or fiber insulators, fencing, gates, security structures,
80 electric motors or other apparatus, metering instruments,
81 communications antenna, environmental control systems, and
82 processing plants that are connected to oil, natural gas,
83 coalbed methane, shale gas, or other petroleum producing
84 properties, equipment, structures, systems, or vehicles.
Page 3

properties, equipment, structures, systems, or vehicles.
HB482 INTRODUCED
85 (8) Any metal property from a school, place of worship,
86 or a secondary metals recycler's premises.
87 (9) A copper, aluminum, or aluminum-copper condensing
88 or evaporating coil, including its tubing or rods, from a
89 heating or air conditioning unit, excluding scrap from window
90 air conditioning units and automobile condenser coils, unless
91 any oneeither of the following criteria are satisfied:
92 a. The condenser coils are being sold by a licensed
93 contractor, HVAC contractor, plumber, or electrician and a
94 current and valid license with number is provided at the time
95 of sale and copied or scanned by the secondary metals recycler
96 at the time of sale.
97 b. The condenser coils are being sold by a person with
98 verifiable documentation, such as a receipt or work order,
99 indicating that the condenser coils are the result of a
100 replacement of an air conditioner unit or condenser coils
101 performed by a licensed contractor.
102 (10) Utility access covers, manhole covers, or storm
103 drain covers, unless the seller is a company that deals in the
104 manufacture or sale of the aforementioned products.
105 (11) Grave markers, vases, memorials, statues, plaques,
106 or other bronze objects used at a cemetery or other location
107 where deceased personsindividuals are interred or
108 memorialized, or any other metal historic markers or monuments
109 or the attached support or post to either, unless the seller
110 is a company that deals in the manufacture or sale of the
111 aforementioned products.
112 (12) Copper wire removed from any building, utility, or
Page 4

(12) Copper wire removed from any building, utility, or
HB482 INTRODUCED
113 other structure.
114 (b)(1) Any Except as provided in subdivision (2), any
115 person in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class
116 C felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of
117 not less than two years.
118 (c)(2) Any person in violation of this section shall be
119 guilty of a Class B felony and shall be sentenced to a term of
120 imprisonment of not less than three years if the damage or
121 destruction causes imminent danger to the health and safety of
122 the public, a metal owner's employees, first responders, law
123 enforcement officers, or utility workers, or cause an
124 interruption in communications services or electric utility
125 services. For purposes of this subsectionsubdivision,
126 "imminent danger" means the existence of any condition that
127 could hinder or disrupt the normal operation of equipment,
128 systems, or services provided for the health and safety of the
129 public, metal owner's employees, first responders, law
130 enforcement officers, or utility workers, or cause an
131 interruption in communications services or electric utility
132 services.
133 (3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
134 contrary, any term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this
135 section shall run consecutive with any other term of
136 imprisonment for any other offense and shall not be eligible
137 for any of the following:
138 a. Probation.
139 b. Community corrections.
140 c. Any split or suspended sentence provision pursuant
Page 5

c. Any split or suspended sentence provision pursuant
HB482 INTRODUCED
141 to Section 15-18-8.
142 d. Any type of early release program, work release
143 program, good time, or any other program which would change
144 the overall time or location of incarceration.
145 e. Any sentencing schedule or worksheet adopted,
146 created, or otherwise released by the Alabama Sentencing
147 Commission.
148 (d)(c) At the time of sentencing of any person
149 convicted under this section, the judge may order restitution
150 in an amount determined by the court; provided, however, the
151 amount shall not be less than the value of the metal property
152 determined to have been damaged or stolen and shall include
153 the cost of replacement and the cost to repair any and all
154 damage caused during the commission of the crime for which the
155 person is convicted."
156 "§13A-8-37
157 (a) It is unlawful for a person to possess or control
158 the following property knowing that itthe property has been
159 stolen or having reasonable grounds to believe itthe property
160 has been stolen, unless the property is possessed or
161 controlled with intent to restore it to the owner:
162 (1) Metal property marked with the initials of an
163 electrical company, a telephone company, a cable company,
164 another public utility, a railroad, or a brewer.
165 (2) Utility access covers, manhole covers, or storm
166 drain covers, unless the seller is a company that deals in the
167 manufacture or sale of the aforementioned products.
168 (3) Street light poles andor fixtures, unless the
Page 6

(3) Street light poles andor fixtures, unless the
HB482 INTRODUCED
169 seller is a company that deals in the manufacture or sale of
170 the aforementionedsuch products.
171 (4) Road and bridge guard rails unless the seller is a
172 company that deals in the manufacture or sale of the
173 aforementionedsuch products.
174 (5) Highway or street signs, traffic light signals,
175 andor traffic directional and control signs unless the seller
176 is a company that deals in the manufacture or sale of the
177 aforementionedsuch products.
178 (6) Water meter covers unless the seller is a company
179 that deals in the manufacture or sale of the
180 aforementionedsuch products.
181 (7) Metal beer kegs including those made of stainless
182 steel that are clearly marked as being the property of a beer
183 manufacturer unless the seller is a company that deals in the
184 manufacture or sale of the aforementionedsuch products.
185 (8) Metal property marked with the name of a government
186 entity.
187 (9) Unused and undamaged building construction or
188 utility materials consisting of copper, pipe, tubing or
189 wiring, aluminum wire, or historical markers.
190 (10) Grave markers, vases, memorials, statues, plaques,
191 or other bronze objects used at a cemetery or other location
192 where deceased personsindividuals are interred or
193 memorialized, unless the seller is a company that deals in the
194 manufacture or sale of the aforementionedsuch products.
195 (11) A copper, aluminum, or aluminum-copper condensing
196 or evaporating coil, including its tubing or rods, from a
Page 7

or evaporating coil, including its tubing or rods, from a
HB482 INTRODUCED
197 heating or air conditioning unit, excluding scrap from window
198 air conditioning units and automobile condenser coils, unless
199 any one of the following criteria are satisfied:
200 a. The condenser coils are being sold by a licensed
201 contractor, HVAC contractor, plumber, or electrician and a
202 current and valid license with number is provided at the time
203 of sale and copied or scanned by the secondary metals recycler
204 at the time of sale.
205 b. The condenser coils are being sold by a person with
206 verifiable documentation, such as a receipt or work order,
207 indicating that the condenser coils are the result of a
208 replacement of an air conditioner unit or condenser coils
209 performed by a licensed contractor.
210 (12) Copper wire removed from a building, utility, or
211 other structure.
212 (b) Any person who violates the requirements of A
213 violation of subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(10) shall be guilty of
214 a punished as follows:
215 (1) On a first violation in a 10-year period, the
216 person shall be guilty of a Class C felony for a first
217 offense, and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of
218 not less than two years.
219 (2) On a second violation in a 10-year period, the
220 person shall be guilty of a Class B felony for a second
221 offense, and and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment
222 of not less than five years.
223 (3) On a third or subsequent violation in a 10-year
224 period, the person shall be guilty of a Class A felony for a
Page 8

period, the person shall be guilty of a Class A felony for a
HB482 INTRODUCED
225 third or subsequent offense within a 10-year period and shall
226 be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 10
227 years.
228 (c) Any person who violates the requirements of A
229 violation of subdivisionssubdivision (a)(1), (a)(3), (a)(4),
230 (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), (a)(8), or (a)(9), (a)(11), or (a)(12)
231 of subsection (a) shall be punished as follows:
232 (1) On a first violation in a 10-year period, the
233 person shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor for a first
234 offense,.
235 (2) On a second violation in a 10-year period, the
236 person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a second
237 offense, and and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment
238 of not less than six months.
239 (3) On a third or subsequent violation in a 10-year
240 period, the person shall be guilty of a Class C felony for a
241 third or subsequent offense within a 10-year period and shall
242 be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than two
243 years.
244 (d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
245 contrary, any term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this
246 section shall run consecutive with any other term of
247 imprisonment for any other offense and shall not be eligible
248 for any of the following:
249 (1) Probation.
250 (2) Community corrections.
251 (3) Any split or suspended sentence provision pursuant
252 to Section 15-18-8.
Page 9

to Section 15-18-8.
HB482 INTRODUCED
253 (4) Any type of early release program, work release
254 program, good time, or any other program which would change
255 the overall time or location of incarceration.
256 (5) Any sentencing schedule or worksheet adopted,
257 created, or otherwise released by the Alabama Sentencing
258 Commission."
259 "§13A-8-37.1
260 (a) It is unlawful for a secondary metals recycler to
261 purchase the following property unless a copy of verifiable
262 documentation in addition to the signed statement required by
263 subdivision (a)(6) of Section 13A-8-31(a)(6) is provided to
264 the secondary metals recycler that the seller is the owner of
265 the property:
266 (1) Catalytic converters that are not part of an entire
267 motor vehicle.
268 (2) Metal property of a telephone company, an electric
269 company, a cable company, a water company, another utility, or
270 a railroad marked or otherwise identified as such.
271 (3) Copper wire that has been burned to remove the
272 insulation, unless verifiable documentation is provided that
273 the source of the copper wire was in a building destroyed by
274 fire.
275 (4) A copper, aluminum, or aluminum-copper condensing
276 or evaporating coil, including its tubing or rods, from a
277 heating or air conditioning unit, excluding scrap from window
278 air conditioning units and automobile condenser coils, unless
279 any one of the following criteria are satisfied:
280 a. The condenser coils are being sold by a licensed
Page 10

a. The condenser coils are being sold by a licensed
HB482 INTRODUCED
281 contractor, HVAC contractor, plumber, or electrician and a
282 current and valid license with number is provided at the time
283 of sale and copied or scanned by the secondary metals recycler
284 at the time of sale.
285 b. The condenser coils are being sold by a person with
286 verifiable documentation, such as a receipt or work order,
287 indicating that the condenser coils are the result of a
288 replacement of an air conditioner unit or condenser coils
289 performed by a licensed contractor.
290 (5) Utility access covers, manhole covers, or storm
291 drain covers, unless the seller is a company that deals in the
292 manufacture or sale of the aforementioned products.
293 (6) Grave markers, vases, memorials, statues, plaques,
294 or other bronze objects used at a cemetery or other location
295 where deceased personsindividuals are interred or memorialized
296 or any other metal historic markers or monuments or the
297 attached support or post to either, unless the seller is a
298 company that deals in the manufacture or sale of the
299 aforementioned products.
300 (7) Any metal property that has been brightly painted
301 or marked to deter theft of the property.
302 (8) Ventilation fans or similar fans designed to supply
303 fresh air to workers in confined spaces, such as underground
304 mines or other similar circumstances.
305 (9) Copper wire removed from any building, utility, or
306 other structure.
307 (b)(1) Any person in violation of this section shall be
308 guilty of a Class B felony and shall be sentenced to a term of
Page 11

guilty of a Class B felony and shall be sentenced to a term of
HB482 INTRODUCED
309 not less than three years.
310 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
311 contrary, any term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this
312 section shall run consecutive with any other term of
313 imprisonment for any other offense and shall not be eligible
314 for any of the following:
315 a. Probation.
316 b. Community corrections.
317 c. Any split or suspended sentence provision pursuant
318 to Section 15-18-8.
319 d. Any type of early release program, work release
320 program, good time, or any other program which would change
321 the overall time or location of incarceration.
322 e. Any sentencing schedule or worksheet adopted,
323 created, or otherwise released by the Alabama Sentencing
324 Commission."
325 "§13A-8-37.4
326 (a) It is unlawful for a possessor or seller of a used,
327 detached catalytic converter, or any nonferrous part of a
328 catalytic converter,property described in Section 13A-8-37(a)
329 to provide any false, fraudulent, altered, or counterfeit
330 information or documentation as required by Section
331 13A-8-37.3this article.
332 (b) A person who commits a violation of this section is
333 shall be punished as follows:
334 (1) On a first violation in a 10-year period, the
335 person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall be
336 sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than six
Page 12

sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than six
HB482 INTRODUCED
337 months.
338 (2) On a second or subsequent violation within a
339 10-year period, the person is shall be guilty of a Class C
340 felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not
341 less than two years.
342 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
343 contrary, any term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this
344 section shall run consecutive with any other term of
345 imprisonment for any other offense and shall not be eligible
346 for any of the following:
347 (1) Probation.
348 (2) Community corrections.
349 (3) Any split or suspended sentence provision pursuant
350 to Section 15-18-8.
351 (4) Any type of early release program, work release
352 program, good time, or any other program which would change
353 the overall time or location of incarceration.
354 (5) Any sentencing schedule or worksheet adopted,
355 created, or otherwise released by the Alabama Sentencing
356 Commission."
357 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
358 1, 2026.
Page 13